src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! !!!Verb inflection

LEXICON V_
+WORK: # ;

!! !!ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_Е !!≈ * __@CODE@__ есь:е
+IV: V-01_Е ;

LEXICON IV_МЭ
+IV: V-01_МЭ       ;

LEXICON TV_МЭ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МЭ       ;

LEXICON VR_МЭ
+Refl: V-01_МЭ-REFL       ;

LEXICON IV_МЫ
+IV: V-01_МЫ       ;

LEXICON TV_МЫ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МЫ       ;

LEXICON VA_НЁ
+Aux: V-01_НЁ       ;

LEXICON VA_НИ
+Aux: V-01_НИ       ;

LEXICON IV_НИ
+IV: V-01_НИ       ;

LEXICON IV_НО
+IV: V-01_НО       ;

LEXICON IV_НУ
!+IV: V-01_НУ       ;
+IV: V-NEW_ХО       ;

LEXICON IV_НУ-Pal/Var
+IV: V-01_НУ       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_НУ
+Refl: V-01_НУ-REFL       ;

LEXICON VR_НУ-Pal/Var
+Refl: V-01_НУ-REFL       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_НУ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НУ       ;

LEXICON TV_НУ-Pal/Var
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НУ       ;
+TV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_НУ/ТУ
+IV: V-01_НУ/ТУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ҢЭ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ңэсь:ңэ
+IV: V-01_ҢЭ       ;

LEXICON IV_ҢЭ-Pal/Var
+IV: V-01_ҢЭ       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

!!LEXICON IV_ТО !!the same as IV_ТУ
!!+IV: V-01_ТО       ;

LEXICON IV_ТУ
+IV: V-01_ТУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ТУ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ТУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ХО
!+IV: V-01_ХО  ;
+IV: V-NEW_ХО  ;


LEXICON TV_ХО
!+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ХО       ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ХО       ;

LEXICON VR_ХО-Pal/Var
!+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL  ; verbs still need dealing with
+Refl: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_ХЭ
+IV: V-01_ХЭ       ;

!! !!TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_НАМДА !!≈ * __@CODE@__ намдась:намда
+IV: V-NEW_НАМДА ;

LEXICON TV_НАМДА
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_НАМДА ;

LEXICON VR_НАМДА
+Refl: V-NEW_НАМДА ;

LEXICON IV_ВАДЮ
+IV: V-01_ВАДЮ       ;

LEXICON TV_ВАДЮ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ВАДЮ       ;

LEXICON IV_ЯКУ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ якась:яка
+IV: V-01_ЯКУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ
+IV: V-01_ИЛЕ	;

LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var ! Work needed for variation 2013-03-04
+IV: V-01_ИЛЕ ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ
+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL	;

LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var ! Work needed for variation 2013-09-05
+Refl: V-01_ИЛЕ-REFL  ;
+Refl: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_ИЛЕ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ИЛЕ	;

LEXICON IV_НЕНЫ
+IV: V-01_НЕНЫ       ;

LEXICON IV_ҢЭСУ
+IV: V-01_ҢЭСУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ҢЭСУ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ҢЭСУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ
+IV: V-NEW_ПЭБЮ       ;

LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ-Pal/Var
+IV: V-NEW_ПЭБЮ       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_ПЭБЮ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ПЭБЮ       ;

!LEXICON VR_ПЭБЮ
!+Refl: V-NEW_ПЭБЮ-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_ХАДАБАСЬ
+IV: V-NEW_ХАДАБАСЬ       ;

!LEXICON IV_ХАДАБАСЬ-Pal/Var
!+IV: V-01_ХАДАБАСЬ       ;
!+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON TV_ХАДАБАСЬ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ХАДАБАСЬ       ;

!LEXICON VR_ХАДАБАСЬ
!+Refl: V-NEW_ХАДАБАСЬ-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_ХАДА !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хадась:хада
!+IV: V-01_ХАДА       ;
+IV: V-NEW_ХАДА       ;

LEXICON TV_ХАДА !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хадась:хада
!+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ХАДА       ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ХАДА       ;

LEXICON VR_ХАДА
!+Refl: V-01_ХАДА-REFL ;
+Refl: V-NEW_ХАДА-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_ЮХУ
+IV: V-01_ЮХУ       ;

LEXICON TV_ЮХУ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЮХУ       ;


!! !THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА
!+IV: V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;
+IV: V-NEW_ЛАХАНА       ;

LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var
+IV: V-NEW_ЛАХАНА       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON VR_ЛАХАНА
+Refl: V-NEW_ЛАХАНА-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА
!+TV@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЛАХАНА       ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ЛАХАНА       ; !!= * __@CODE@__ 3-syll

LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ЛАХАНА       ;
+TV: PRC_PALVAR ;

LEXICON IV_ҢЭДАРА
+IV: V-NEW_ҢЭДАРА ;
LEXICON TV_ҢЭДАРА
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ҢЭДАРА ;
LEXICON VR_ҢЭДАРА
+Refl: V-NEW_ҢЭДАРА-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_СЯНАКУ
+IV: V-01_СЯНАКУ       ;

LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ
!! * Yaml: __V-yaqwlasj__
+IV: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ      ;

LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ-Pal/Var
+IV: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ	; ! more work to be done with -Pal/Var 2013-03-04
+IV: PRC_PALVAR ;

!LEXICON VR_ЯˮАВЛУ
!+Refl: V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ-REFL      ;

LEXICON TV_ЯˮАВЛУ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ      ;

!! !ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
LEXICON IV_МАН  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ манзь:ма%{нңʼØ%} 
!! * Yaml: __manzj__
+IV: V-01_МАН       ;

LEXICON IV_МИН
+IV: V-01_МИН       ;

LEXICON IV_МИН-Pal/Var
+IV: V-01_МИН       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON TV_МИН
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_МИН       ;

LEXICON VR_МИН
+Refl: V-01_МИН-REFL ;

LEXICON IV_САС
+IV: V-01_САС       ;

LEXICON VR_САС
+Refl: V-01_САС-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_САС !!= * @CODE@ манэць:манэ
!!= * Yaml: __V-manecj__
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_САС       ;

LEXICON TV_САС-Pal/Var
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_САС       ;
+TV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON IV_ТИР
+IV: V-NEW_ТИР       ;

LEXICON IV_ТИР-Pal/Var
+IV: V-NEW_ТИР       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON VR_ТИР
+Refl: V-01_ТИР-REFL       ;

LEXICON TV_ТИР
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ТИР       ;

LEXICON TV_ТИР-Pal/Var
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ТИР       ;
+TV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

!! !TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
LEXICON IV_НЭКАЛ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 
+IV: V-01_НЭКАЛ       ;

LEXICON TV_НЭКАЛ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_НЭКАЛ       ;

LEXICON IV_ҢАДИМ/ҢАРАМ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 2013-12-16
+IV: V-01_ҢАДИМ       ;
+IV: V-01_ҢАРАМ       ;


LEXICON IV_ҢАДИМ-Pal/Var
+IV: V-01_ҢАДИМ       ;
+IV: PRC_PALVAR2 ;

LEXICON IV_ҢАДИМ
+IV: V-01_ҢАДИМ       ;

LEXICON VR_ҢАРАМ
+Refl: V-01_ҢАРАМ-REFL	;

LEXICON IV_ҢАРАМ
+IV: V-01_ҢАРАМ       ;

LEXICON TV_ҢАРАМ
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-01_ҢАРАМ	;



!! !!AFTER +TV, +IV, +Aux, +Refl
!! Not yet written.

!! !!CONJUGATION BY STEM TYPE

!! !ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL

LEXICON V-01_Е
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@+Ind:@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@+Ind:@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Imprt-Obj ;
 V_Opt ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Opt-Obj ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
 IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
 CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_МЭ
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@+Ind:@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-AOR-OC-WITH-OCDU3-IN_ҢА ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@+Ind:@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_IND-4-PRT1-OC ;
 V_PREC ;
 V_Hort ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_Hort-Obj ;
 V_Imprt-Scsg2 ;
 V_Imprt ;
 V_Opt ;
 V_Subord ;
 V_AUD ;
 V_Conj ;
 V_HAB ;
 V_Fut_ҢГУ ;
 V_Mod/appr ;
 V_Mod/des ;
 V_Mod/futappr ;
 V_Mod/hyp ;
 V_Mod/int ;
 V_Mod/narr ;
 V_Mod/narrPrt ;
 V_Mod/nec ;
 V_Mod/perfprob ;
 V_Mod/prob ;
 V_Mod/perfappr ;
 V_Mod/obl ;
 V_Mod/rep ;
 V_Mod/sup ;
 IND-AOR		;
 IND-AOR-SG3 	;
:%>ңа IND-AOR-DU3 	;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1-DU3 ;
+Ind: IND-4-PRT1		;
 PRC ;
 PRC-IMPRF ;
 PRC-FUT ;
 PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; !!= * @CODE@	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
:%^VowRaise CONNEG ;

LEXICON V-01_МЭ-REFL !! V_refl 
 IND-AOR-RCSG1	;
 IND-AOR-RCSG2	;
 IND-AOR-RCSG3	;
 IND-AOR-RCDU1	;
 IND-AOR-RCDU2 	;
 IND-AOR-RCDU3 	;
 IND-AOR-RCPL1 	;
 IND-AOR-RCPL2 	;
 IND-AOR-RCPL3 	;
